Illinois, session 104th, SB4117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $10,980,500, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Office of Executive Inspector General for its 8ordinary and contingent expenses. 9    Section 10. The amount of $2,089,600, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public 11Transportation Fund to the Office of Executive Inspector 12General for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142026.